District of Columbia statutes.
5-133.19

Regulations for use of video surveillance by Metropolitan Police Department.

(a)

The Chief of Police, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue regulations pertaining to the Metropolitan Police Department’s use of video surveillance cameras and technology in the operation of its Joint Operations Command Center/Synchronized Operations Command Center.

(b)

The proposed regulations shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess.

(c)

If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution, within this 45-day review period, the proposed regulations shall be deemed disapproved.

Oct. 1, 2002, D.C. Law 14-190, § 2702, 49 DCR 6968

Resolution 14-609, the “Metropolitan Police Department Closed Circuit Television System Regulations Approval Resolution of 2002”, was approved effective November 22, 2002.

Resolution 16-699, the “Metropolitan Police Department Closed Circuit Television System Regulations Amendment Disapproval

Resolution of 2006“, was approved effective July 7, 2006.

Short title of subtitle A of title XXVII of Law 14-190: Section 2701 of D.C. Law 14-190 provided that subtitle A of title XXVII of the act may be cited as the Metropolitan Police Department Video Surveillance Regulations Act of 2002.
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 5-133.19, see § 2602 of Fiscal Year 2003 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-453, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8026).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 5-133.19, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department Video Surveillance Regulations Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-302, March 25, 2002, 49 DCR 3393).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Metropolitan Police Department Video Surveillance Regulations Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-158, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6494).